Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1339
Federal funds; solicitation; use.

The board is encouraged to solicit and authorized to expend any federally distributed funds from the Energy Settlement Fund, account number 6071, or any other federal funds which may become available to the board for ethanol development. Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Agricultural Alcohol Fuel Tax Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 15;

Laws 1989, LB 587, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-1315;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 10.